Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-212 Application for authority.
To apply for an original certificate of authority, an insurer shall:

(1) File with the commissioner its request showing:

(A) Its name, home office location, type of
insurer, organization date, and state or country of its domicile, and name and
location of principal office of its attorney-in-fact if a reciprocal insurer;

(B) The classes of insurance it proposes to
transact; and

(C) Additional information as the
commissioner may reasonably require;

(2) File with the commissioner:

(A) A copy of its charter as amended or such
copy certified by the proper public officer of the state or country of domicile
if a foreign or alien insurer;

(B) A copy of its bylaws as amended,
certified by its proper officer;

(C) A copy of its annual statement as of
December 31 last preceding;

(D) An appointment of the commissioner as its
attorney to receive service of legal process, if a foreign or alien insurer, or
a domestic reciprocal insurer;

(E) The name and business address of its
authorized resident agent upon whom process may be served in all cases, if a
foreign or alien insurer;

(F) A copy of the appointment and authority
of its United States manager, certified by its proper officer, if an alien
insurer;

(G) A certificate from the proper public
official of its state or country of domicile showing that it is duly organized
and is authorized to transact the classes of insurance proposed to be
transacted, if a foreign or alien insurer;

(H) The declaration required by section
431:4-409 if a domestic reciprocal insurer;

(I) Certificate of the proper public official
as to any deposit made or held in compliance with this code;

(J) Copy of report of the last examination
made of the insurer certified by the insurance supervisory official of its
state of domicile or entry into the United States, if a foreign or alien
insurer; and

(K) Other documents or stipulations as
the commissioner may reasonably require to evidence compliance with this code;
and

(3) Deposit with the commissioner the appropriate
fees required by this code. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §7; am
L 2003, c 212, §21]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next